Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-107 Filing of certificate.
(a) Every insurer shall file with the commissioner a certificate signed by an
officer of the insurer stating that the contract meets the minimum Flesch
reading ease score required in section 431:10-104(1).

(b) Whenever the score is lower than the
minimum allowed under section 431:10-104(1), the insurer shall file the
certificate indicating the lower score and requesting the contract be approved
under section 431:10-108. The insurer shall file with the certificate a copy
of the contract and additional information necessary to support its request.
Each filing requesting an approval pursuant to section 431:10-108 shall be
accompanied by a $20 fee payable to the commissioner, which fee shall be
deposited in the commissioner's education and training fund.

(c) In determining the accuracy of any
certificate, the commissioner may require the insurer to submit a copy of the
contract and any additional information. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c
207, §10]

Cross References

Commissioner's education and training fund, see §431:2-214.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next